test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ING_STEM_1.gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_ING_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_ING_STEM_1

     ñíng+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñíng
     ñíng+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíngga
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng
     ñíng+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñínggang
     ñíng+V+DIRECT+PAST: ñínggan
     ñíng+V+RELATIVE: ñíngs
     ñíng+V+NON_FACTIVE: ñíngang
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínggang
     ñíng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíngganggang
     ñíng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínggangang
     ñíng+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínggiinii
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínggaangaa
     ñíng+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñínggaangaan
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíngäsaa
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíngäs
     ñíng+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíngäsaang
     ñíng+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíngäsga
     ñíng+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíngäsaas
     ñíng+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíngäsaa.ang
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasa'áa
     ñíng+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasa'áang
     ñíng+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasaasdláa
     ñíng+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasaasdláang
     ñíng+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'uuj
     ñíng+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'uujang
     ñíng+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíngäsaa'uujang
     ñíng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíng'us
     ñíng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'ujaa
     ñíng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'uujaangaa
     ñíng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíngäsaa'us
     ñíng+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíngäsaa'ahlans
     ñíng+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíngäseehl
     ñíng+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñíng'uu
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'waa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'waa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'waang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñíng'wägan
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'aawaa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíng'aawaan
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñíng'waas
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíng'aawaas
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'waa.ang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'aawaa.ang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínggang'waa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínggang'waang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínggang'waa.ang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'wägiinii
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'wägaangaa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'wägaangaan
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíng'waaäsaa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíng'waaäs
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíng'waaäsaang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíng'waaäsga
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíng'waaäsaas
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'waaäsaa.ang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'waa'uuj
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'waa'uujang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíng'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíng'waa'us
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'waa'ujaa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'waa'uujaangaa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíng'waaäsaa'us
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíng'waa'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíng'waa'ahlanggan
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíng'waa'ahlans
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíng'aawaa'ahlang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñíng'waa'ahl
     ñíng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíng'waaäseehl
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñíng'ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'angga
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'anggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: ñíng'anggan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'aangaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíng'aangaan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: ñíng'ans
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíng'aangaas
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'angang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'aangaa.ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñíng'anggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínggang'anggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínggang'angang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'anggiinii
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'anggaangaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'anggaangaan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíng'angäsaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíng'angäs
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíng'angäsaang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíng'angäsga
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíng'angäsaas
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'angäsaa.ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasaa'áng
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíngang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'uuj
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'uujang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíng'angäsaa'uujang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'us
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'ang'ujaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'ang'uujaangaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíng'angäsaa'us
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíng'aang'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíng'aang'ahlanggan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'aang'ahlanggiinii
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíng'angäsaa'ahlans
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíng'aang'ahlans
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíng'aangaa'ahlang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíng'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíng'aangaa'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: ñíng'aang'ahl
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíng'angäseehl
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñíng'ang'uu
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñíng'ang'wägan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'ang'aawaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñíng'ang'aawaan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñíng'ang'waas
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñíng'ang'aawaas
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'ang'waa.ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'ang'aawaa.ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínggang'ang'waa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñínggang'ang'waang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñínggang'ang'waa.ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'ang'wägiinii
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'ang'wägaangaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'ang'wägaangaan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñíng'ang'waaäsaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñíng'ang'waaäs
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñíng'ang'waaäsaang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñíng'ang'waaäsga
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñíng'ang'waaäsaas
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñíng'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñíng'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waa'uuj
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waa'uujang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñíng'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waa'us
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñíng'ang'waa'ujaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñíng'ang'waaäsaa'us
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñíng'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñíng'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñíng'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñíng'ang'waa'ahlans
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñíng'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñíng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñíng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñíng'ang'waa'ahl
     ñíng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñíng'ang'waaäseehl
